Oklahoma, session 2026, SB278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8228 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce, with the assistance of


nonprofit organizations, and any state agency, board, commission, or


department with information or resources that could assist the


Department, shall create and administer a program under which


survivors of the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre living on the effective


date of this act shall each receive a payment of Two Million Dollars


($2,000,000.00) from the Tulsa Race Massacre Victims’ Compensation


Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 2 of this act. If a


survivor dies prior to receipt of such payment, a payment not to

Req. No. 908 Page 1


exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) cumulatively shall be


disbursed to legatees as designated in a will of such survivor, or


to the descendants of the survivor as provided by laws of succession


of this state if the survivor dies intestate.


B. The Oklahoma Department of Commerce shall work with and


receive input from a committee to be composed of:


1. A member of the Senate whose district includes the Greenwood


District in Tulsa to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore of


the Senate;


2. A member of the House of Representatives whose district


includes the Greenwood District in Tulsa to be appointed by the


Speaker of the House of Representatives; and


3. A member to be appointed by the Chief Executive Officer of


the Oklahoma Department of Commerce.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8229 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the “Tulsa


Race Massacre Victims’ Compensation Revolving Fund”. The fund shall


be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and


shall consist of all monies received by the Oklahoma Department of


Commerce from appropriations provided for the purpose of


compensating survivors of the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre. All monies

Req. No. 908 Page 2


accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and shall


be budgeted and expended by the Oklahoma Department of Commerce for


the purpose provided for in Section 1 of this act. Expenditures


from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State


Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Tulsa Race


Massacre Victims’ Compensation Revolving Fund created in Section 2


of this act from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the


General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year


ending June 30, 2023, the sum of Four Million Dollars


($4,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to pay


restitution to living survivors affected during the events of


approximately May 31, 1921, through June 1, 1921, in the city of


Tulsa, which events shall be known as the “Tulsa Race Massacre”.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-908 TEK 12/30/2024 10:14:20 PM



Req. No. 908 Page 3